Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2506
Deep thermal agent modalities, defined.

Deep thermal agent modalities means therapeutic ultrasound, phonophoresis, and other commercially available technologies. Deep thermal agent modalities does not include the use of diathermy or lasers.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 846;

Laws 2025, LB257, § 5.